California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 13127.3, if the director finds that delays in submitting the mandatory health effects studies were primarily caused by actions of the department, the director, with the concurrence of the Secretary for Environmental Protection, may extend the deadlines for submitting the mandatory health effects studies for the following active ingredients creosote, pentachlorophenol, dicamba, para-dichlorobenzene, methyl bromide, napropamide, petroleum distillates, and arsenic pentoxide/trioxide. Registrants of these products shall submit the required studies in a timely manner, but in no case later than the time allowed in Section 13127.92.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1228, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.32.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, none of the following pesticide products shall remain registered in this state:

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), no pesticide product containing an active ingredient identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13127 for which the required studies have not been submitted by March 30, 1996, shall remain registered after that date.

(b) No pesticide product containing methyl bromide or pentachlorophenol for which the required studies have not been submitted by December 31, 1997, shall remain registered after that date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 4.   Effective June 14, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.5.

(a) The director, with the concurrence of the Secretary for Environmental Protection, may defer the suspension of registration of a pesticide product, as provided in Section 13127.2, if both of the following occur: 

(1) The director receives a petition from the registrant or any other person requesting a deferral of suspension. 

(2) The director makes a written finding of one of the following: 

(A) Suspension of the registration of the product would cause substantial economic hardship to the users of the product, that there would be no significant, unmitigated human exposure to the product, and that no feasible alternatives to the product are available. 

(B) Suspension of the registration of the product would be more detrimental to the agricultural or nonagricultural environment than continued use of the product, that there would be no significant, unmitigated human exposure to the product, and that no feasible alternatives to the product are available.

(C) Suspension of the registration of the product would result in significant risk to the public health and that no feasible alternatives to the product are available. 

(b) The director shall limit the use of any product granted a deferral of suspension pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to specific uses that conform to the director’s findings pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1228, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.6.

The director shall levy a charge on data generators of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day a data gap continues to exist after the date the director issues a deferral of suspension of registration pursuant to Section 13127.5. In establishing the amount of the charge, the director shall consider the number of outstanding studies, the registrant’s timely response to data call-ins on other products registered with the department pursuant to this article, and whether the registrant has responded in a timely and appropriate manner to notices and correspondence from the department relating to data call-ins, and whether the registrant has taken appropriate measures to address study deficiencies identified by the department. If the charge levied on the data generator is not paid, all products containing that active ingredient shall be suspended. Revenues collected from the levying of charges shall be deposited in the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 706, Sec. 16.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.7.

All documentation relevant to a finding made pursuant to Sections 13127.3 and 13127.5 shall be available to the public, and the findings shall be a public record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1228, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.8.

(a) A suspension of registration of a pesticide product containing any of the active ingredients identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13127 shall be revoked when the director determines that the registrant has submitted all of the mandatory health effects studies. If, upon completion of the review of the studies, the director determines that a data gap still exists, the director shall suspend the registration. 

(b) If at any time after January 1, 1992, the registrant meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 13127.3, notwithstanding the date specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13127.3, the director shall revoke the suspension, and shall levy a charge pursuant to Section 13127.6 or, if a charge has already been levied on a registrant, the director may revise the charge in light of the registrant’s compliance with the requirements of this article and Article 15 (commencing with Section 13141). 

(c) The director may modify the amount of the charge levied pursuant to Section 13127.6 upon the initiation or submission of any health effects studies required pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1228, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.9.

For each mandatory health effects study that is required for each active ingredient identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13127, the registrant shall submit to the department a progress report in December of each year until the study is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1228, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.91.

The director shall suspend the registration of any pesticide product that contains an active ingredient identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13127 for which the registrant fails to do any of the following:

(a) Respond to the director’s notification of a data gap. 

(b) Submit progress reports as required by Section 13127.9. 

(c) Demonstrate reasonable progress toward completion of all the mandatory health effects studies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1228, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.92.

(a) Extensions of time granted pursuant to Sections 13127.3, 13127.31, and 13127.5 shall only be for the time necessary to complete the mandatory health effects studies.

(b) Mandatory health effects studies shall be completed in accordance with the following timetable:

(1) Forty-eight months for oncogenicity, chronic feeding, and reproduction studies.

(2) Twenty-four months for teratogenicity and neurotoxicity studies.

(3) Twelve months for mutagenicity studies.

(c) A deferral of suspension of registration issued pursuant to Section 13127.5 shall be subject to an annual review by the director and shall be limited to the time necessary to complete the required studies, and shall in no case exceed four years with the time tolling from the date that the registrant petitioned for an extension.

(d) Any extension of time for submission of the mandatory health effects studies granted pursuant to Section 13127.5 shall be canceled by June 15, 1993, and the registration suspended for the affected ingredient, if the registrant fails to initiate the required studies by June 15, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 199.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13128.

No applicant for registration or current registrant of a pesticide who proposes to purchase or purchases a registered pesticide from another producer in order to formulate the purchased pesticide into an end use product shall be required pursuant to Section 13127 to submit or cite mandatory health effect data pertaining to the safety of the purchased product or to offer to pay reasonable compensation for the use of any such data if the producer is engaged in fulfilling the requirements of Section 13127.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1083, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

13129.

(a) If the director, after evaluation of the health effects study of an active ingredient, finds that a pesticide product containing the active ingredient presents significant adverse health effects, including reproduction, birth defects, or infertility abnormalities, the director shall take cancellation or suspension action against the product pursuant to Section 12825 or 12826.

(b) The State Director of Health Services shall have access to mandatory health effects studies and other health effects studies on file at the Department of Food and Agriculture, and may, based upon the determination of the State Director of Health Services, provide advice, consultation, and recommendations concerning the risks to human health associated wth exposure to the substances tested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 669, Sec. 1.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

13130.3.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 13127, the time permitted by the director for submitting data to fill a data gap shall be as follows: 

(1) For oncogenicity studies and chronic feeding studies, 48 months. 

(2) For reproduction studies, 48 months. 

(3) For teratogenicity and neurotoxicity studies, 24 months. 

(4) For mutagenicity studies, 12 months. 

The time permitted by the director for submitting data to fill a data gap shall commence upon the date the department notifies the registrant of the data gap. 

(b) Notwithstanding the time limit established in subdivision (a) for submitting data to fill a data gap, the department may, with the concurrence of the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, grant an extension of time to complete the required studies, upon a written finding that events beyond the control of the persons responsible for submitting the data prevent submission of the data within the prescribed time, and that those persons have made a good faith effort to complete the studies within the prescribed time. Not more than one extension of time per data requirement may be granted to complete the required studies. The length of an extension granted pursuant to this subdivision shall be limited to the time necessary to complete the studies, not to exceed the length of time specified in subdivision (a) for conducting the studies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1228, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

13131.1.

(a) Not later than March 1, 1992, the director shall notify registrants of the data requirements, and the guidelines the director intends to use in reviewing studies submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13127, for all pesticide active ingredients other than those identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13127. 

(b) Not later than 90 calendar days after the date of notification of the data requirements, each registrant shall do one of the following: 

(1) Inform the department, in a manner prescribed by the director, of how the registrant will comply with the data requirements. 

(2) File a written objection, accompanied by any supporting evidence and arguments, to all or part of the director’s notice of data requirements. The objection authorized by this paragraph shall be the exclusive opportunity for a registrant to object to the director’s notice of data requirements. 

(c) The director may consider and grant a request by a registrant to initiate the studies necessary to comply with the data requirements in accordance with a schedule established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. In no event shall a registrant be authorized pursuant to this subdivision to initiate the studies necessary for that compliance after January 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1227, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

13131.2.

(a) Prior to March 1, 1992, or in response to a written objection filed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 13131.1, the department may determine, with the concurrence of the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, that one or more of the mandatory health effects studies are not required in order to evaluate pesticide active ingredients other than those identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13127. This determination may be made only in accordance with one or more of the following criteria: 

(1) The ingredient has been classified as “Generally Recognized as Safe” by the United States Food and Drug Administration. 

(2) The study is not physically possible due to the nature of the ingredient. 

(3) The department has on file toxicological data that is adequate for the assessment of the potential adverse health effects of the ingredient, and the studies relied upon for that purpose are of the same study type, are scientifically valid, and, when taken together, are of a power and sensitivity equivalent to the studies that would be waived pursuant to this subdivision. 

(b) The director may, in conjunction with the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, develop regulations for modification of mandatory health effects studies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1227, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13131.3.

If the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment does not concur with the determination of the department pursuant to Section 13131.2, the issue shall be decided by a majority of the membership of a panel consisting of the following persons:

(a) An appointee of the State Director of Health Services who has expertise in toxicology. 

(b) An appointee of the President of the University of California who has expertise in toxicology. 

(c) An appointee of the Secretary for Environmental Protection who has expertise in toxicology.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1227, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

13131.4.

(a) On or before January 1, 1994, the director shall issue a final notice of data gaps required to be filled for all pesticide active ingredients other than those identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13127. This notice shall be the department’s final determination of the data gaps required to be filled. 

(b) The time allowed under Section 13130.3 to fill the data gaps shall commence on the date that the final notice of data gaps is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), unless an extension is granted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13130.3. 

(c) Not later than 90 calendar days after the date the final notice of data gaps is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), each registrant shall inform the department, in a manner prescribed by the director, how the registrant will fill the data gap, including a proposed schedule for initiation, completion, and submittal of all required studies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1228, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

13131.5.

The director shall suspend the registration of any pesticide containing an active ingredient for which the director notifies a registrant pursuant to Section 13131.1 and for which the registrant or data generator, in the judgment of the director, fails to respond appropriately or fails to provide evidence that it is taking appropriate steps to secure the data that are required pursuant to Section 13131.1 or the final notice of data gaps pursuant to Section 13131.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 764, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

13133.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, this invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 13132 (as renumbered from 13130 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1227) by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

13134.

(a) The department, in cooperation with the State Department of Health Services, shall conduct an assessment of dietary risks associated with the consumption of produce and processed foods treated with pesticides. This assessment shall integrate adequate data on acute effects and the mandatory health effects studies specified in subdivision (c) of Section 13123, appropriate dietary consumption estimates, and relevant residue data based on the department’s and the State Department of Health Services’ monitoring data and appropriate field
 experimental and food technology information to quantify consumer risk. Differences in age, sex, ethnic, and regional consumption patterns shall be considered. The department shall submit each risk assessment to the State Department of Health Services, with necessary supporting documentation, for peer review, which shall consider the adequacy of public health protection. The State Department of Health Services may provide comments to the department. The department shall formally respond to all of the comments made by the State Department of Health Services. The department shall modify the risk assessment to incorporate the comments as deemed appropriate by the
 director. All correspondence between the department and the State Department of Health Services in this matter shall be made available to any person, upon request, pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) The department shall consider those pesticides designated for priority food monitoring pursuant to Section 12535 and the results of the department’s or the State Department of Health Services’ monitoring in establishing priorities for the dietary risk assessments.

(c) (1) If the department lacks
 adequate data on the acute effects of pesticide active ingredients or mandatory health effects studies specified in subdivision (c) of Section 13123 necessary to accurately estimate dietary risk, the department shall require the appropriate data to be submitted by the registrant of products whose labels include food uses. This subdivision shall not be construed to affect the timeframes established pursuant to Section 13127.

(2) No applicant for registration, or current registrant, of a pesticide who proposes to purchase or purchases a registered pesticide from another producer in order to formulate the purchased pesticide into an end use product shall be required to submit or cite data pursuant to this section or offer to pay reasonable compensation for the use of that type of data if the producer is engaged in fulfilling the data requirements of
 this section.

(d) (1) If a registrant fails to submit the data requested by the director pursuant to this section within the time specified by the director, the director shall issue a notice of intent to suspend the registration of that pesticide. The director may include in the notice of intent to suspend any provisions that are deemed appropriate concerning the continued sale and use of existing stocks of that pesticide. Any proposed suspension shall become final and effective 30 days from the receipt by the registrant of the notice of intent to suspend, unless during that time a request for hearing is made by a person adversely affected by the notice or the registrant has satisfied the director that the registrant has complied fully with the requirements that served as a basis for the notice of intent to suspend. If a
 hearing is requested, a hearing shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The only matter for resolution at the hearing shall be whether the registrant has failed to take the action that served as the basis for the notice of intent to suspend the registration of the pesticide for which additional data is required and whether the director’s determination with respect to the disposition of existing stocks is consistent with this subdivision.

(2) A hearing shall be held and a determination made within 75 days after receipt of a request for a hearing. The decision rendered after completion of the hearing shall be final. Any registration suspended shall be reinstated by the director if the director determines that the registrant has complied fully with the requirements
 that served as a basis for the suspension of the registration.

(e) If the department finds that any pesticide use represents a dietary risk that is deleterious to the health of humans, the department shall prohibit or take action to modify that use or modify the tolerance pursuant to Section 12561, or both, as
 necessary to protect the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 121.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

13135.

The department and the State Department of Health Services shall jointly review the existing federal and state pesticide registration and food safety system and determine if the existing programs adequately protect infants and children from dietary exposure to pesticide residues. The review shall commence as early as possible in 1990, so that any policy or administrative adjustments determined to be necessary as a result of the joint review can be made on a timely basis. The department shall consult with the University of California and other qualified public and private entities in conducting the joint review. The joint review shall continue for a sufficient time in order to evaluate the report of infant exposure to pesticide residues, which is presently being undertaken by the National Academy of Sciences. Within six months of the official release of the National Academy of Sciences’ study, the department shall finalize a report describing the evaluation that was conducted pursuant to this section, including any recommendations for modification of the existing regulatory system in order to adequately protect infants and children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 62.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. The Pesticide Contamination Prevention Act [13141. - 13152.]

13141.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is the right of every citizen in this state to drink safe, potable, wholesome, and pure drinking water.

(b) The health and economic prosperity of rural communities and individual farm families in the state are threatened by contaminated drinking water supplies because of their proximity to the use of pesticides.

(c) Pesticide contaminants and other organic chemicals are being found at an ever increasing rate in underground drinking water supplies.

(d) The United States Environmental Protection Agency has concluded that evidence of relatively localized levels of pesticide pollution should be treated as a warning of more widespread, future contamination.

(e) Groundwater once polluted cannot be easily cleaned up; thus, there is a considerable potential that groundwater pollution will continue long after actions have been taken to restrict application of the pesticide to land.

(f) Due to the potential widespread exposure to public drinking water supplies from pesticide applications to the land and the resultant risk to public health and welfare, the potential for pollution of groundwater due to pesticide use must be considered in the registration, renewal, and reregistration process.

(g) It is the purpose of this article to prevent further pesticide pollution of the groundwater aquifers of this state which may be used for drinking water supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1298, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13142.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Active ingredient” has the same meaning as defined in Section 136 of Title 7 of the United States Code.

(b) “Agricultural use” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11408.

(c) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(d) “Chemigation” means a method of irrigation whereby a pesticide is mixed with irrigation water before the water is applied to the crop or to the soil.

(e) “Degradation product” means a substance resulting from the transformation of a pesticide by physicochemical or biochemical means.

(f) “Groundwater protection data gap” means that, for a particular pesticide, the director, after study, has been unable to determine that each study required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13143 has been submitted or that each study submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13143 is valid, complete, and adequate.

(g) “Henry’s Law constant” is an indicator of the escaping tendency of dilute solutes from water and is approximated by the ratio of the vapor pressure to the water solubility at the same temperature.

(h) “Pesticide” is defined in Section 12753.

(i) “Pesticide registrant” means a person that has registered a pesticide pursuant to this chapter.

(j) “Pollute” means to introduce a pesticide product into the groundwaters of the state resulting in an active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or a degradation product of a pesticide above a level that does not cause adverse health effects, accounting for an adequate margin of safety.

(k) “Pollution” means the consequence of polluting.

(l) “Soil adsorption coefficient” is a measure of the tendency of pesticides, or their biologically active transformation products, to bond to the surfaces of soil
 particles.

(m) “Soil microbial zone” means the zone of the soil below
 which the activity of microbial species is so reduced that it has no significant effect on pesticide breakdown.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 626, Sec. 1.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13143.

(a) Not later than December 1, 1986, a person that has registered a pesticide in California for agricultural use shall submit to the director the information prescribed in this subdivision. The information shall be submitted for each active ingredient in each pesticide registered. The registrant shall submit all of the following information:

(1) Water solubility.

(2) Vapor pressure.

(3) Octanol-water partition coefficient.

(4) The soil adsorption coefficient.

(5) Henry’s Law constant.

(6) Dissipation studies, including hydrolysis, photolysis, aerobic and anaerobic soil metabolism, and field dissipation, under California or similar environmental use conditions.

(7) Any additional information the director determines is necessary.

(b) The director also may require the information prescribed in subdivision (a) for other specified ingredients and degradation products of an active ingredient in any pesticide. The director shall also require this information when the State Department of Health Services or the board submits a written request for the information to the director, if the State Department of Health Services or the board specifies the reasons why it considers the information necessary. The director shall deny the request upon a written finding that, based on available scientific evidence, the request would not further the purposes of this article.

(c) All information submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be presented in English and summarized in tabular form on no more than three sheets of paper with the actual studies, including methods and protocols attached. All information , at a minimum, shall meet the testing methods and reporting requirements provided by the Environmental Protection Agency Pesticide Assessment Guidelines, Subdivision D Series 60 to 64, inclusive, for product chemistry and Subdivision N Series 161 to 164, inclusive, for environmental fate, including information required for degradation products in specific studies. With prior approval from the director, registrants may use specified alternative protocols as permitted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency guidelines, if the director finds use of the protocol is consistent with, and accomplishes the objectives of, this article. Studies conducted on active ingredients in the formulation of pesticides shall meet the same testing methods as required for studies conducted on active ingredients. The department, in consultation with the board, in addition, may require specified testing protocols that are specific to California soil and climatic conditions. The director may give a pesticide registrant an extension of up to two years if it determines that this additional time is necessary and warranted to complete the studies required in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a). No extension of the deadline for these studies shall go beyond December 1, 1989. When seeking the extension, the registrant shall submit to the director a written report on the current status of the dissipation studies for which the extension is being sought. For registrants granted an extension pursuant to this section, Section 13145 shall be effective upon the completion date established by the director.

(d) The director may grant the registrant an extension beyond the one authorized in subdivision (c), if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The registrant submits a written request to the director for an extension beyond the one granted pursuant to subdivision (c). The request shall include the reasons why the extension is necessary and the findings produced by the study up to the time the request is made.

(2) The director finds that the registrant has made every effort to complete the studies required in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) within the required time limits of the extension granted pursuant to subdivision (c) and that those studies could not be completed within the required time limits due to circumstances beyond the control of the registrant.

(3) The director establishes a final deadline, not to exceed one year beyond the time limit of the extension granted pursuant to subdivision (c), and a schedule of progress by which the registrant shall complete the studies required in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a).

(e) After December 1, 1986, no registration of any new pesticide shall be granted unless the applicant submits all of the information required by the director pursuant to this article and the director finds that the information meets the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13144.

(a) The department shall establish specific numerical values for water solubility, soil adsorption coefficient (Koc), hydrolysis, aerobic and anaerobic soil metabolism, and field dissipation. The values established by the department shall be at least equal to those established by the Environmental Protection Agency. The department shall revise the numerical values when the department finds that the revision is necessary to protect the groundwater of the state. The numerical values established or revised by the department shall always be at least as stringent as the values being used by the Environmental Protection Agency at the time the values are established or revised by the department.

(b) On or before December 31, 2004, and updated at least annually thereafter, the director shall post the following information on the department’s Internet Web site for each pesticide registered for agricultural use and during years that specific numerical values are revised:

(1) A list of each active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product of an active ingredient of a pesticide for which there is a groundwater protection data gap.

(2) The Groundwater Protection List established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13145.

(3) For each pesticide listed pursuant to paragraph (2) for which information is available, a list of the amount sold
 in California during the most recent year for which sales information is available and where and for what purpose the pesticide was used, when this information is available in the pesticide use report.

(c) The department shall determine, to the extent possible, the toxicological significance of the pesticides listed in the Groundwater Protection List.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 626, Sec. 2.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13145.

(a) Any registrant of a pesticide identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 13144 is subject to a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day the groundwater protection data gap exists. In determining the amount of the fine, the director shall consider both of the following:

(1) The extent to which the registrant has made every effort to submit valid, complete, and adequate information within the required time limits.

(2) Circumstances beyond the control of the registrant that have prevented the registrant from submitting valid, complete, and adequate
 information within the required time limits.

(b) If there is a dispute between the director and a registrant regarding the existence of a groundwater protection data gap and the director desires to levy a fine on the registrant pursuant to this section, the director shall submit the issues of the dispute to the subcommittee created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13150. The subcommittee shall review the evidence submitted by the registrant and the director and make recommendations to the director on whether or not the groundwater data gap exists.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to pesticide products whose registration has lapsed or has been canceled, or to products that have been granted a current extension pursuant to Section 13143.

(d) The director shall, by regulation, establish the Groundwater Protection List, which shall include each active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product of a pesticide that, when applied, has the potential to pollute groundwater.

(e) The director, in consultation with the subcommittee created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13150, shall develop a peer reviewed method to determine the potential of a pesticide to pollute groundwater using specific numerical values established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13144. The director may revise this method, subject to peer review. The peer review shall be conducted using the same process as described in Section 57004 of the Health and Safety Code. When a chemical is listed by regulation using this
 method, no further peer review of the method is required.

(f) Each active ingredient, other specified ingredient, or degradation product of a pesticide on the Groundwater Protection List that is detected pursuant to Sections 13148 and 13149 and determined to be a result of lawful agricultural use shall be regulated to prevent groundwater pollution in accordance with this article.

(g) Any person who uses a pesticide that has been placed on the Groundwater Protection List and does not file a report pursuant to Section 12979, is required to report to the county agricultural commissioner the use of the pesticide on a form prescribed by the director. The reporting deadline shall conform to the
 deadline established for the reporting of the use of restricted materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 626, Sec. 3.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13146.

(a) The director shall not register or renew the registration of a pesticide intended to be applied to or injected into the ground by ground-based application equipment or by chemigation after December 1, 1988, if there is a groundwater protection data gap for that pesticide, unless the registrant has been granted a current extension pursuant to Section 13143.

(b) The director shall not register or renew the registration of a pesticide intended for use with other than ground-based application equipment after December 1, 1989, if there is a groundwater protection data gap for that pesticide, unless the registrant has been granted a current extension pursuant to Section 13143.

(c) If a registrant does not comply with the information requirements of Section 13143, the department shall file the information requirements of Section 13143 in accordance with procedures provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Section 136a of Title 7 of the United States Code. In order to carry out this section, the director has the same authority to require information from registrants of active pesticide ingredients that the administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency has pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Section 136a of Title 7 of the United States Code. On or before July 1, 1986, the director shall, by regulation, prescribe procedures for resolving disputes or funding the filing of the information requirements of Section 13143. The procedures may include mediation and arbitration. The arbitration procedures, insofar as practical, shall be consistent with the federal act, or otherwise shall be in accordance with the commercial arbitration rules established by the American Arbitration Association. The procedures shall be established so as to resolve any dispute with the timetable established in Section 13143.

(d) For an active ingredient or pesticide for which a registrant or registrants do not provide the information required pursuant to Section 13143, the director may determine the active ingredient or pesticide to be critical to agricultural production and the director may utilize assessments charged to those registrants of the active ingredient for which the information is required pursuant to Section 13143 in amounts necessary to cover the department’s expenses in obtaining the information. The assessment shall be made pursuant to Section 12824. The director may also request an appropriation to be used in combination with assessments to obtain the required information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13147.

The director shall annually request a budget appropriation in order to meet the reasonable and anticipated costs of conducting soil and water monitoring pursuant to Section 13148, a review of data submitted pursuant to Section 13143, and the administration of pesticides placed on the Groundwater Protection List pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13148.
